Massachusetts, session 194th, S452.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 89 of Chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, in section (h), the following paragraph: - 
Within 30 days of the approval of a new commonwealth charter school in any 
community, the board shall issue a written confirmation that the school meets all requirements 
set out in subsection (b), (e) and (f) of this section and in the implementing regulations, and a 
summary of the reasons therefore. 
SECTION 2. Said section 89 of said Chapter 71, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended, in subsection (l), by inserting at the end thereof the following sentence:- 
Charter schools shall not solicit applications for enrollment by offering money or gifts of 
any monetary value as an incentive for application. 

of 2 11  SECTION 3. Said section 89 of said Chapter 71, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended, in section (ee), by striking the first sentence and inserting in place thereof the 
following sentence: - The board may revoke a school’s charter if the school has not fulfilled any 
conditions imposed by the board in connection with the grant of the charter, the school has 
violated any provision of its charter, or the board has substantially violated any provision of this 
section or its implementing regulations in granting the charter. 
SECTION 4. Said section 89 of said Chapter 71, as so appearing, is hereby further 
amended by adding at the end thereof the following new subsection:- 
(nn) The board shall develop procedures and guidelines for the waiver of any regulations; 
provided, however, that no waiver shall be issued except at the written request of the charter 
applicant or at the written request of the board itself, both of which shall only be for exceptional 
circumstances.  Said waiver must be accompanied by a written explanation of the reasons for the 
waiver, and may only be issued by a 2/3 vote of the board.